Illinois, session 104th, HB2571.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-168 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-168)7    Sec. 15-168. Homestead exemption for persons with 8disabilities.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption is granted to persons with disabilities in the 11amount of $2,000, except as provided in subsection (c), to be 12deducted from the property's value as equalized or assessed by 13the Department of Revenue. The person with a disability shall 14receive the homestead exemption upon meeting the following 15requirements:16        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 17    residence by the person with a disability.18        (2) The person with a disability must be liable for 19    paying the real estate taxes on the property.20        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 21    record of the property or have a legal or equitable 22    interest in the property as evidenced by a written 23    instrument. In the case of a leasehold interest in   HB2571- 2 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1    property, the lease must be for a single family residence.2    A person who has a disability during the taxable year is 3eligible to apply for this homestead exemption during that 4taxable year. Application must be made during the application 5period in effect for the county of residence. If a homestead 6exemption has been granted under this Section and the person 7awarded the exemption subsequently becomes a resident of a 8facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 9Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 10ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act, then the exemption 11shall continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be 12occupied by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the 13residence remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person 14qualified for the homestead exemption.15    (a-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if 16property was granted a homestead exemption under this Section 17for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2025, and 18if the property remains eligible for the homestead exemption 19under this Section in a subsequent consecutive taxable year, 20then the total property tax liability for the property for the 21applicable taxable year may not exceed the total property tax 22liability for (i) taxable year 2025 or (ii) the first year in 23which the property became eligible for the exemption under 24this Section with respect to the particular applicant, 25whichever occurs later, unless the chief county assessment 26officer finds that there were substantial improvements made to   HB2571- 3 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1the property during the previous taxable year or years. This 2subsection applies continuously as long as the property 3remains eligible for the exemption under this Section. 4    (b) For the purposes of this Section, "person with a 5disability" means a person unable to engage in any substantial 6gainful activity by reason of a medically determinable 7physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result 8in death or has lasted or can be expected to last for a 9continuous period of not less than 12 months. Persons with 10disabilities filing claims under this Act shall submit proof 11of disability in such form and manner as the Department shall 12by rule and regulation prescribe. Proof that a claimant is 13eligible to receive disability benefits under the Federal 14Social Security Act shall constitute proof of disability for 15purposes of this Act. Issuance of an Illinois Person with a 16Disability Identification Card stating that the claimant is 17under a Class 2 disability, as defined in Section 4A of the 18Illinois Identification Card Act, shall constitute proof that 19the person named thereon is a person with a disability for 20purposes of this Act. A person with a disability not covered 21under the Federal Social Security Act and not presenting an 22Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card stating 23that the claimant is under a Class 2 disability shall be 24examined by a physician, optometrist (if the person qualifies 25because of a visual disability), advanced practice registered 26nurse, or physician assistant designated by the Department,   HB2571- 4 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1and his status as a person with a disability determined using 2the same standards as used by the Social Security 3Administration. The costs of any required examination shall be 4borne by the claimant.5    (c) For land improved with (i) an apartment building owned 6and operated as a cooperative or (ii) a life care facility as 7defined under Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities Act that is 8considered to be a cooperative, the maximum reduction from the 9value of the property, as equalized or assessed by the 10Department, shall be multiplied by the number of apartments or 11units occupied by a person with a disability. The person with a 12disability shall receive the homestead exemption upon meeting 13the following requirements:14        (1) The property must be occupied as the primary 15    residence by the person with a disability.16        (2) The person with a disability must be liable by 17    contract with the owner or owners of record for paying the 18    apportioned property taxes on the property of the 19    cooperative or life care facility. In the case of a life 20    care facility, the person with a disability must be liable 21    for paying the apportioned property taxes under a life 22    care contract as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care 23    Facilities Act.24        (3) The person with a disability must be an owner of 25    record of a legal or equitable interest in the cooperative 26    apartment building. A leasehold interest does not meet   HB2571- 5 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1    this requirement. 2If a homestead exemption is granted under this subsection, the 3cooperative association or management firm shall credit the 4savings resulting from the exemption to the apportioned tax 5liability of the qualifying person with a disability. The 6chief county assessment officer may request reasonable proof 7that the association or firm has properly credited the 8exemption. A person who willfully refuses to credit an 9exemption to the qualified person with a disability is guilty 10of a Class B misdemeanor. 11    (d) The chief county assessment officer shall determine 12the eligibility of property to receive the homestead exemption 13according to guidelines established by the Department. After a 14person has received an exemption under this Section, an annual 15verification of eligibility for the exemption shall be mailed 16to the taxpayer.17    In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the 18chief county assessment officer shall provide to each person 19granted a homestead exemption under this Section a form to 20designate any other person to receive a duplicate of any 21notice of delinquency in the payment of taxes assessed and 22levied under this Code on the person's qualifying property. 23The duplicate notice shall be in addition to the notice 24required to be provided to the person receiving the exemption 25and shall be given in the manner required by this Code. The 26person filing the request for the duplicate notice shall pay   HB2571- 6 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1an administrative fee of $5 to the chief county assessment 2officer. The assessment officer shall then file the executed 3designation with the county collector, who shall issue the 4duplicate notices as indicated by the designation. A 5designation may be rescinded by the person with a disability 6in the manner required by the chief county assessment officer.7    (d-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 8chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 9the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 10that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 11year, provided that: 12        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 13    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 14    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 15        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 16    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 17    as of January 1, 2019; 18        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 19    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 20    this Code; and 21        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 22    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 23    taxable years. 24    (d-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 25chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 26the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property   HB2571- 7 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 2year, if:3        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 4    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 5    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;6        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 7    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 8    as of January 1, 2020;9        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 10    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 11    this Code; and12        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 13    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 14    taxable years. 15    (d-15) For taxable years 2022 through 2027, in any county 16of more than 3,000,000 residents, and in any other county 17where the county board has authorized such action by ordinance 18or resolution, a chief county assessment officer may renew 19this exemption for any person who applied for the exemption 20and presented proof of eligibility, as described in subsection 21(b), without an annual application as required under 22subsection (d). A chief county assessment officer shall not 23automatically renew an exemption under this subsection if: the 24physician, advanced practice registered nurse, optometrist, or 25physician assistant who examined the claimant determined that 26the disability is not expected to continue for 12 months or   HB2571- 8 -LRB104 05685 HLH 21428 b1more; the exemption has been deemed erroneous since the last 2application; or the claimant has reported their ineligibility 3to receive the exemption. A chief county assessment officer 4who automatically renews an exemption under this subsection 5shall notify a person of a subsequent determination not to 6automatically renew that person's exemption and shall provide 7that person with an application to renew the exemption. 8    (e) A taxpayer who claims an exemption under Section 915-165 or 15-169 may not claim an exemption under this 10Section. 11(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 12103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.